Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.030

Cities having ten thousand or more population may frame charter for own government.

Any city with a population of ten thousand or more inhabitants may frame a charter for its own government.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 47 s 5; 1965 c 7 s 35.22.030. Prior: 1890 p 215 s 1; RRS s 8951.]

NOTES:

Cities of ten thousand or more

may frame charters without change in classification: RCW 35.22.195.

permitted to frame charters: State Constitution Art. 11 s 10 (Amendment 40).